Illinois, session 104th, SB4116.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the General 8Revenue Fund to the Governor's Office of Management and 9Budget: 10  For all costs and administrative expenses11   associated with implementing, monitoring and12   reporting State agency expenditures of funds13   received from the federal government, including14   funds made available under the American Rescue15   Plan Act or any other federal act..................550,00016  For all costs and administrative expenses17   associated with financial audits, internal 18   controls, and reporting of the State's 19   financial statements...............................790,00020  For operational expenses of the Budgeting21   for Results Initiative.............................400,00022  For Operational Expenses..........................3,540,00023    Total                                          $5,280,000   SB4116- 2 -OMB104 00219 LMM 10219 b12    Section 10. The amount of $1,400,000, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Capital 4Development Fund to the Governor's Office of Management and 5Budget for ordinary and contingent expenses associated with 6the sale and administration of General Obligation Bonds. 7    Section 15. The amount of $4,300,000, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Grant 9Accountability and Transparency Fund to the Governor's Office 10of Management and Budget for costs in support of the 11implementation and administration of the Grant Accountability 12and Transparency Act and the Budgeting for Results initiative. 13    Section 20. The amount of $113,400, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the School 15Infrastructure Fund to the Governor's Office of Management and 16Budget for operational expenses related to the School 17Infrastructure Program. 18    Section 25. The amount of $757,700,000, or so much thereof 19as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build Illinois 20Bond Retirement and Interest Fund to the Governor's Office of 21Management and Budget for the purpose of making payments to 22the Trustee under the Master Indenture as defined by and   SB4116- 3 -OMB104 00219 LMM 10219 b1pursuant to the Build Illinois Bond Act. 2    Section 30. The amount of $650,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build Illinois Bond 4Fund to the Governor's Office of Management and Budget for 5ordinary and contingent expenses associated with the sale and 6administration of Build Illinois bonds. 7    Section 35. No contract shall be entered into or 8obligation incurred for any expenditures from the 9appropriations made in Sections 10, 25, and 30 until after the 10purposes and amounts have been approved in writing by the 11Governor. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.